Illinois, session 104th, HB2196.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Meat and Poultry Inspection Act is amended 5by changing Section 5 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 650/5)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 305)7    Sec. 5. Exemptions; producers, retailers, and poultry 8raisers. Exemptions - Producers, Retailers, and Poultry 9Raisers. 10    The following types of establishments are exempt from the 11specific provisions of this Act:12        (A) A "producer" means any person engaged in producing 13    agricultural products, for personal or family use, on 14    whose farm the number of animals or poultry is in keeping 15    with the size of the farm or with the volume or character 16    of the agricultural products produced thereon, but does 17    not mean any person engaged in producing agricultural 18    products who:19            1. actively engages in buying or trading animals 20        or poultry or both; or21            2. actively engages directly or indirectly in 22        conducting a business which includes the slaughter of 23        animals or poultry or both, for human food purposes;   HB2196 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 11666 AAS 21755 b1        or2            3. actively engages, directly or indirectly, in 3        canning, curing, pickling, freezing, salting meat or 4        poultry, or in preparing meat or poultry products for 5        sale. ; or6            4. slaughters or permits any person to slaughter 7        on his or their farm animals or poultry not owned by 8        the producer for more than 30 days.9        (A-5) Retail dealers or retail butchers with respect 10    to meat or poultry products sold directly to consumers in 11    retail stores; provided, that the only processing 12    operation performed by such retail dealers or retail 13    butchers is the cutting up of meat or poultry products 14    which have been inspected under the provisions of this Act 15    and is incidental to the operation of the retail food 16    store.17        (B) Poultry raisers with respect to poultry raised on 18    their own farms or premises if:19            (a) if such raisers slaughter, eviscerate, or 20        further process not more than 7,500 5,000 poultry 21        during the calendar year for which this exemption is 22        being granted;23            (b) such poultry raisers do not engage in buying 24        or selling poultry products other than those produced 25        from poultry raised on their own farms or premises;26            (c) such poultry or poultry products are   HB2196 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 11666 AAS 21755 b1        slaughtered, otherwise prepared, sold or delivered to 2        the consumer on or from the premises for which the 3        exemption is given, including sales at the poultry 4        raiser's farm, at a farmers' market, at a roadside 5        stand, or through delivery to the consumer;6            (d) such slaughter or preparation shall be 7        performed in sanitary facilities, in a sanitary 8        manner, and subject to periodic inspection by 9        Department personnel;10            (e) persons desiring such exemptions shall submit 11        in writing a request to the Department;12            (f) there is at least one person who is 13        responsible for all periods of operation for the 14        premises for which the exemption is given who has 15        successfully obtained a certification as a Certified 16        Food Protection Manager from a program that is 17        accredited by the American National Standards 18        Institute;19            (g) the poultry products are labeled in at least 20        10-point font to include the producer's name and 21        address, the date on which the poultry product was 22        processed, and the statement "NOT INSPECTED-Exempt 23        P.L. 90-492";24            (h) at the point of sale, notice is provided in a 25        prominent location and states the following: "These 26        poultry products were processed in an on-farm facility   HB2196 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 11666 AAS 21755 b1        that is exempt from continuous inspection by the 2        Illinois Department of Agriculture or the United 3        States Department of Agriculture.". A notice on a 4        physical display shall be prominently displayed on a 5        placard in at least 18-point font. A notice displayed 6        online shall be displayed in the form of a message on 7        the farm's online sales interface at the point of 8        sale;9            (i) at the point of sale at farmers' markets, 10        information in the form of a placard, flyer, or 11        product label shall be provided to consumers regarding 12        safe handling instructions for poultry or poultry 13        products produced under this Section as described in 9 14        CFR 381.125(b) with the rationale statement provided 15        in 9 CFR 381.125(b)(2)(ii);16            (j) poultry and poultry products produced under 17        this Section shall be maintained at temperatures as 18        provided in Section 3.3 of the Food Handling 19        Regulation Enforcement Act during storage, 20        transportation, shipping, and delivery; and21            (k) poultry or poultry products produced under 22        this Section that are sold, offered for sale, or 23        otherwise distributed at farmers' markets shall be 24        sealed in a watertight or leakproof bag or other 25        watertight or leakproof packaging. 26        An The exemption under this Section shall be effective   HB2196 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 11666 AAS 21755 b1    upon written notice from the Department and shall remain 2    in effect for a period of 2 years, unless revoked. 3    Adequate records must be maintained to assure that not 4    more than the number of exempted poultry are slaughtered 5    or processed in one calendar year. Such records shall be 6    kept for one year following the termination of each 7    exemption. Any advertisement regarding the exempt poultry 8    or poultry products shall reflect the fact of exemption so 9    as not to mislead the consumer to presume official 10    inspection has been made under the Meat and Poultry 11    Inspection Act.12(Source: P.A. 91-170, eff. 1-1-00; 91-614, eff. 1-1-00; 92-16, 13eff. 6-28-01.)